Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,103.03
Cease and desist order; hearing.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act or any rule or regulation, an order may be entered requiring the person to appear before the director to show cause why an order should not be entered requiring such person to cease and desist from the violation charged. Such order shall set forth notice of such hearing. Hearings shall be conducted as provided in section 2-10,103.04. After such hearing, if the director finds such person to be in violation, he or she shall enter an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the specific act, practice, or omission which violated the act.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 25.